Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.160.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admissions application" means an individual application to enroll as an undergraduate or graduate student at an institution of higher education.

(2) "Criminal record" or "criminal history" includes any record about a citation or arrest for criminal conduct, including any records relating to probable cause to arrest, and includes any record about a criminal or juvenile case filed with any court, whether or not the case resulted in a finding of guilt.

(3) "Institutions of higher education" means the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, the community colleges, and the technical colleges that receive state funds.

(4) "Third-party admissions application" means an admissions application not controlled by the institution.

[ 2018 c 83 s 1.]